apertium-sme-nob.sme.lexc
LEXICON HOHPI !Bisyll. V-Adj's with s-Attr. in WeG & Adv.
 +A+Attr:%>X4s ATTR ; ! X4 => WeG, not W1 => no vow ch
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +A:%> ADVV ;
 +A: VUOHTA ;        ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation

LEXICON LAIKI !Bisyll. V-Adj's with es-Attr. in WeG & Adv.
 +A+Attr:%>W1s ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +A:%> ADVV ;
 +A: VUOHTA ;         ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation

LEXICON LODJI !bisyll V-Adj with -es and -is Attr in WeG
 +A+Attr:%>X4s ATTR ; ! #lojis
 +A+Attr+Use/NG:%>W1s ATTR ; ! #lojes
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +A:%> ADVV ;
 +A: VUOHTA ;         ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation
! LODJI combines HOHPI and LAIKI. Hohpi now redirected here

!LEXICON VEADDJI ! bisyll, s Attr, no CG
!K ; ne, det er JUHKKIS som er riktig leksikon.

LEXICON JUHKKIS !Bisyll. V-Adj. with s-Attr; no Adv.
 +A+Attr:s ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
! +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ; !no comparatives for these

LEXICON HAHTTI !Bisyll. V-Adj. no Adv.
 +A+Attr:%> ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
! +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ; !no comparatives for these


LEXICON NUORRA !Bisyll. V-Adj. w/CG, w/o Sep. Attr; no Adv.
 +A+Attr:%> ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;

LEXICON RIEKTA ! Bisyll adj w/o obl sg forms, WeG Attr
 +A+Attr+Dial/%-KJ:a%> ATTR ;     ! riekta
 +A+Attr+Use/NG:e%>X4s ATTR ;  ! rievttes
 +A+Attr+Use/NG:e%>X9s ATTR ;  ! rivttes
! +A+Attr+Sg+Nom:a%> K ; ! riekta ! tag misnomer?
 +A+Sg+Nom:a%> K ;
 +A+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:ás%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A+Use/Sub:as%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:a%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +A:a%> ADVV ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:a%> PxV ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:a%>n%> PxC ;
 +A:a  VUOHTA ;         ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation



LEXICON VIELG ! adj with -es -attrib. (cns final adj)
 +A+Attr:e%>Y9s¤ ATTR ;
 +A:ad VIELGAT ;

LEXICON VIELGAT
 :%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%> MALLASadj- ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +SgNomCmp#:»X7# NAMAT ;
! GARRAS- ; ! GAPPUS- instead

LEXICON VIELG_NOCOMP ! adj with -es -attrib. (cns final adj)
 +A+Attr:e%>Y9s ATTR ;
 +A:ad VIELGAT_NOCOMP ;

LEXICON VIELGAT_NOCOMP
! :%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%> MALLASadj- ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +SgNomCmp#:»X7# NAMAT ;
! GARRAS- ; ! GAPPUS- instead


LEXICON CAHKK
 +A+Attr+Use/NG:e%>Y9s ATTR ;
 :ad JOHTIL ;

LEXICON JALGAT
 +A+Attr:%>a ATTR ;
 VIELG ;

LEXICON UHCC
 +A+Attr:a%>W1 ATTR ;
 +A:i%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:i%>X4 BU/MUS ;


LEXICON JEAGOHEAPMI
 +A+Attr:%>is ATTR ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%>in K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>eame%>t K ; ! parallel form, -it also poss.
! +A+Comp+Sg+Nom:%>at K ;   ! parallel form
 +A:%>eapmi%> HEAPMI ;
 +A+Use/Sub:%>eapme7%> HEAPMI ;
 +A+Ess:%>eapmi%>X1n K ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X7n K ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X1n%> PxC ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X7n%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eapme%>s K ; ! !parallel form
 +A+Sg+Gen:%>eame%> R ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%>eami%> R ;
 +A+Pl+Gen:%>emi%>jd R ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
 +A+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
! +A:%>is VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
 +A+Der1+Der2+Der/huvva+V+IV:»uvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +A+Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV:»uhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON BIVNNUHEAPME ! no bivnnuhis here
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%>in K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>eame%>t K ; ! parallel form, -it also poss.
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom:%>at K ;   ! parallel form
 +A:%>eapmi%> HEAPMI ;
 +A+Use/Sub:%>eapme7%> HEAPMI ;
 +A+Ess:%>eapmi%>X1n K ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X7n K ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X1n%> PxC ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X7n%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eapme%>s K ; ! !parallel form
 +A+Sg+Gen:%>eame%> R ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%>eami%> R ;
 +A+Pl+Gen:%>emi%>jd R ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
 +A+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
! +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
! +A:%>is VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
 +A+Der1+Der2+Der/huvva+V+IV:»uvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +A+Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV:»uhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP
 +A+Attr:%>is ATTR ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%>in K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>eame%>t K ; ! parallel form, -it also poss.
 +A:%>eapmi%> HEAPMI ;
 +A+Use/Sub:%>eapme7%> HEAPMI ;
 +A+Ess:%>eapmi%>X1n K ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X7n K ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X1n%> PxC ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X7n%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eapme%>s K ; ! !parallel form
 +A+Sg+Gen:%>eame%> R ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%>eami%> R ;
 +A+Pl+Gen:%>emi%>jd R ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
 +A+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
! +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
! +A:%>is VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
 +A+Der1+Der2+Der/huvva+V+IV:»uvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +A+Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV:»uhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON OATNI !only this adj
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +A:%> ADVV ;


! Consonant-final even-syllabic adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON ISSORAS ! issoras and certain as-adj. also derivations, final -s
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 +A+Use/Sub: VUOHTA ; ! = issorvuohta
 :ass    DEARVVASLAS2 ; 
 +A+Pl+Nom:assaX4t K ; ! pga Oahpa og Use/NG
 +A+Use/NG:assa%> ISSORASSA- ;

LEXICON DABALAS ! -laš adjectives with short Adv/Comp forms
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ; 
             :ažž DEARVVASLAS2 ;
     +Use+Sub:ážž  DEARVVASLAS2 ; ! This form (á pro a) is wrong but common. Sub.
             +A+Use/NG:ažža NVDCompAttr_ISSORASSA- ;
     +Use/Sub+A:ážža ISSORASSA- ;

LEXICON NVDCompAttr_ISSORASSA-
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub: PxV ; ! ! tentative.
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Sub:n%> PxC ; ! ! tentative, check.
 +Comp+Sg+Nom:X4b K ;
 +Comp+Attr+Use/NVD:X4b%> K ;  ! Comp are also Attr.
 +Comp+Use/Sub:X4b Rreal ;    
 +Comp#+Use/Sub:X4b»# NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj
 +Comp#+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:X4b»# ALIT ;  ! both comp and independent adj
 +Comp+Sg+Gen:X4bu K ;
 +Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:X4b K ;
 +Comp+Sg+Acc:X4bu K ;
 +Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:X4b K ;
 +Comp+Pl+Nom:X4but K ;
 +Comp+Ess:X4bun K ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:X4b»uš%> ATTRCONT ; 
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:X4b»uš K ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:X4b»užža%> BUOREMUSSA- ;
 +Comp+Sg+Ill:X4buj K ;
 +Comp+Sg+Loc:X4bus K ;
 +Comp+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X4bun K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Comp+Sg+Com:X4bujn K ;
 +Comp+Pl+Gen:X4bujd K ;
 +Comp+PlGenCmp:X4bujd R ;
 +Comp+Pl+Acc:X4bujd K ;
 +Comp+Pl+Ill:X4bujdda K ;
 +Comp+Pl+Loc:X4bujn K ;
 +Comp+Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:X4bujs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Comp+Pl+Com:X4bujgujn K ;
 +Comp+Pl+Com/Sh:X4buj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Comp+Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bustti%> PxV ;
 +Comp+Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bujnni%> PxV ;
! +Comp+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:X4bujddi%> PxV ; !^P^ !MARG
 +Comp+Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bujddi%> PxV ;
 +Comp+Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bujddi%> PxV ;
 +Comp+Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bujddás%> PxC ;
 +Comp+Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bujnni%> PxV ;
 +Comp+Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bujddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 +Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:X4but K ;
 +Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4busa%> PxV ;
 +Comp+Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4buiddá%> Px1V ;
 +Superl:X4muss BUOREMUS ; 
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:X4t K ;
 HEAPMIOBL ;



LEXICON DEARVVASLAS ! -laš adjectives without short Adv/Comp forms.
        DEARVVASLAS2 ; 
 +A:a%> ISSORASSA- ;

LEXICON DEARVVASLAS2 ! just to lift out ISSORASSA-
 +A+Attr:%> ATTR ;
 +A: JOHTOLAT0 ;
 +A: VUOHTA ;
! word dearvvaslaš/dearvvašlaš not directed here, but to DABALAS
 
LEXICON STUORIBUS ! -buš comparatives
 +A+Comp+Attr:%> K ;
 +A+Comp: JOHTOLAT0 ;
 +A+Comp+Use/Sub: VUOHTA ;
 +A+Comp+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +A+Comp:a%> EABBUCASE2 ;

! word dearvvaslaš/dearvvašlaš not directed here, but to DABALAS

LEXICON ASEHAS
 +A+Attr:%>is ATTR ;
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 +A:%>is VUOHTA ;
 +A:ažž JOHTOLAT0 ;
 +A+Use/NG:ažža%> ISSORASSA- ;

LEXICON Eahpe_Adjective
eahpe#duohta:eahpe#duoh'ta NUORRA "true A" ;
eahpi#bassi+Use/Sub:eahpi7#bassi NUORRA ;
eahpi#duohta+Use/Sub:eahpi7#duoh'ta NUORRA ;
eahpi#gullu+Use/Sub:eahpi7#gullu NUORRA ;
eahpi#jáhkihahtti+Use/Sub:eahpi7#jáhki7hahtti¤ HAHTTI ;
eahpi#veaddji+Use/Sub:eahpi7#vead'ji¤ HAHTTI ;
eahpe#bassi:eahpe#bassi NUORRA ;
eahpe#gullu:eahpe#gullu NUORRA ;
eahpe#jáhkihahtti:eahpe#jáhkihahtti¤ HAHTTI ;
eahpe#luohtihahtti:eahpe#luohtihahtti¤ HAHTTI ;
eahpe#gustojeaddji:eahpe#gustojeaddji¤ HAHTTI ;
eahpe#jáhkihahtti:eahpe#jáhki7hahtti¤ HAHTTI ;
eahpe#luohttevaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:eahpe#luohttevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
eahpe#oadjebas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:eahpe#oadjebass DEARVVASLAS ;
eahpe#rávvehahtti:eahpe#rávvehahtti¤ HAHTTI ;
eahpe#riekta:eahpe#riek't RIEKTA ; ! no sg obl
LEXICON Adjective
aiddolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:aiddol DABALAS ;
asehaš:aseh ASEHAS "thin A" ;
bargguheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bargguh JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
bassi NUORRA ;
bissovaš:bissovažž DEARVVASLAS ;
buoidi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:buoj'di LAIKI ;
báhkinlaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:báhkinl DABALAS ;
diehttalas:diehttal ISSORAS ;
duhtavaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duhtavažž DEARVVASLAS ;
duohta:duoh'ta NUORRA "true A" ;
dárki+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dár'ki LAIKI ;
rehálaš+Use/Sub:rehal DABALAS ;
falli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:falli LODJI; !
fiskat:fisk VIELG ;
fuolaheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fuolah JEAGOHEAPMI ;
fuotni+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fuotni LAIKI; !
fántásttalaš+Use/Sub:fántásttal DABALAS ;
geatnegas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:geatneg ISSORAS ;
gielaheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gielah JEAGOHEAPMI ;
giitevaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:giitevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
goavvi LAIKI ;
guohttu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guoh'tu¤ JUHKKIS ;
gustojeaddji:gustojeaddji¤ HAHTTI ;
gutneheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gutneh JEAGOHEAPMI ;
guvges#ruoksat:guvges#ruoks VIELG_NOCOMP ;
hatteheapme:hatteh JEAGOHEAPMI ;
headju+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:head'ju LAIKI ;
hilbat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hilb VIELG ;
hillji+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hillji LODJI; !
ieš#beaivválaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ieš#beaivvál DABALAS ;
issoras:issor ISSORAS "terrible A" ;
jalahas:jalah ISSORAS ;
jalgat:jalg JALGAT ;
joavdelas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:joavdel ISSORAS ;
jorbat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jorb VIELG ;
juhkki+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:juh'ka¤ JUHKKIS ;
jállu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jállu LODJI; !
konkrehtalaš:kon^krehtal DABALAS ;
lihkoheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lihkoh JEAGOHEAPMI ;
loažžat:loažž CAHKK ;
lodji+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lod'ji LODJI "tame A" ;
luohttevaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:luohttevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
láivi:láj'vi LAIKI ;
lášmat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lášm CAHKK ;
meariheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:meari7h JEAGOHEAPMI ;
mearkkašahtti:mearkkašahtti¤ HAHTTI ;
máđoheapme:máđoh JEAGOHEAPMI ;
njaláhas:njaláh ISSORAS ;
oadjebas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oadjebass DEARVVASLAS ;
oanehaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oaneh ASEHAS ;
oskkáldas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oskkáld ISSORAS ;
positiivvalaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:positijval DABALAS ;
radikála+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:radikála NUORRA; !
rašši LAIKI ;
riekta:riek't RIEKTA ; ! no sg obl
roahkkat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:roahkk CAHKK ;
ropmi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ropmi LODJI; !
ruškat:rušk VIELG ;
seaggi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:seagg UHCC ;
seavdnjat:seavdnj CAHKK ;
sivaheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sivah JEAGOHEAPMI ;
suollemas:suollemass DEARVVASLAS ;
surgat:surg CAHKK ;
sáhppat:sáhpp VIELG ;
teatrálalaš:teatrálal DABALAS ;
udju+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:ud'ju LODJI ;
udju+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ud'ju HOHPI ;
uhcci+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:uhcc UHCC ;
umáhttu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:umáhttu LAIKI ;
unni:un'n UHCC ; ! attr unna
valli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:valli LODJI; !
vitmat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vitm VIELG ;
vuollegaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuolleg ASEHAS ;
vuovdi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuov'di¤ JUHKKIS ;
váfi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:váfi LODJI; !
várrogas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:várrog ISSORAS ;
áhpeheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:áhpeh JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
árbmugas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:árbmug ISSORAS ;
árgi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ár'gi LAIKI ;
árvvoheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:árvvoh JEAGOHEAPMI ;
čeaskat:čeask VIELG ;
čorgat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:čorg JALGAT ; ! !
šealgat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:šealg VIELG ;
šearrat:šearr CAHKK ;
šiega+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:šiega NUORRA; !
šođbat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:šođb VIELG ;
